Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds and declares the following:


1. School-based services provided in accordance with the


Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) are intended


exclusively for students with disabilities to ensure access to a

Req. No. 2301 Page 1


free appropriate public education (FAPE) for students with an


individualized education program (IEP);


2. IDEA does not allow state legislators, the Superintendent of


Public Instruction, the State Department of Education, school


districts in this state, or the Oklahoma Health Care Authority to


expand school-based services beyond the scope provided for in


paragraph 1 of this section;


3. School-based health centers function as primary health care


providers that operate on or off campus or via telehealth and fall


outside the professional and academic scope of public education;


4. School-based health centers grant broad authority to school-


based health care providers to conduct medical testing, administer


treatment, and make medical decisions based on one-time parental


consent without requiring the presence of a parent or legal guardian


at the time testing is administered or treatment is provided;


5. Medical ethics and established health care practices


prohibit physicians from treating minors without direct involvement


from a parent or legal guardian, ensuring the prevention of power


imbalances and safeguarding the rights of a parent or legal


guardian; and


6. The Oklahoma Constitution does not establish a right to


school-based health care; however, it explicitly defines the purpose


of public schools in this state as academic instruction, independent



Req. No. 2301 Page 2


of sectarian control, with no provision for state-funded health care


clinics.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-127 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The State Department of Education shall be prohibited


from accepting federal funds including, but not limited to, block


grants provided for the purpose of expanding school-based health


care services or implementing school-based health centers or


clinics.


2. The State Department of Education shall review all existing


contracts entered into by the Department or the State Board of


Education and terminate any related to expanding school-based health


care services or implementing school-based health centers or


clinics.


B. The State Department of Education, in consultation with


school districts in this state, shall conduct a comprehensive


compliance review of all individualized education programs (IEPs)


developed for students to ensure that any medical services provided


in accordance with an IEP are educationally necessary. If an IEP


contains medical services that are not educationally necessary, such


services shall be removed and the student shall be evaluated to


determine whether a Section 504 Plan developed pursuant to the


Rehabilitation Act of 1973 is more appropriate.

Req. No. 2301 Page 3


C. School district boards of education or charter school


governing boards in this state shall review all existing contracts


and shall terminate any related to expanding school-based health


care services or implementing school-based health centers or


clinics.


D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2301 EB 1/13/2026 5:25:52 PM





















Req. No. 2301 Page 4